Washington statutes.
RCW 9.73.080

Penalties.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any person who violates RCW 9.73.030 is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(2) Any person who knowingly alters, erases, or wrongfully discloses any recording in violation of RCW 9.73.090(1)(c) is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2000 c 195 s 3; 1989 c 271 s 209; 1967 ex.s. c 93 s 6.]

NOTES:

Intent—2000 c 195: See note following RCW 9.73.090.

Severability—1989 c 271: See note following RCW 9.94A.510.

Severability—1967 ex.s. c 93: See note following RCW 9.73.030.